Utah statutes.
32A-1-302 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Presentation of proof of age upon request.
(1)  To obtain one or more of the following, a person shall present proof of
age at the request of a person listed in Subsection (2):
(a)  an alcoholic beverage or alcoholic product;
(b)  admittance that under this title may not be obtained by a minor to a
premises where an alcoholic beverage or alcoholic product is sold or consumed;
or
(c)  employment that under this title may not be obtained by a minor.
(2)  To determine whether the person described in Subsection (1) is 21 years
of age, the following may request a person described in Subsection (1) to
present proof of age:
(a)  a person authorized by law to sell or otherwise handle an alcoholic
beverage or alcoholic product;
(b)  a peace officer;
(c)  a representative of the State Bureau of Investigation of the Department
of Public Safety, established in Section 53-10-301; or
(d)  an authorized employee of the department.
